District of Columbia statutes.
42-1402

Application for sale by verified bill; contents; parties.

Any application for such sale shall be by bill, verified by the oath of the party or parties, in which all the facts shall be distinctly set forth upon the existence of which it is claimed that such sale should be decreed, which facts shall be proved by competent testimony. All of the issue embraced in the limitation who are in existence at the time of the application shall be made parties defendant, together with all who would take the estate in case the limitation over should never vest; and minors of the age of 14 years or more shall answer in proper person under oath, as well as by guardian ad litem, and all evidence shall be taken upon notice to the parties and the guardian ad litem.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1205, ch. 854, § 98
1981 Ed., § 45-1002.
1973 Ed., § 45-1102.